dargwa.numerals.twol
Alphabet
  и а у I
  %{а%}:е %{а%}:а
  %{у%}:0 %{у%}:у
  %{и%}:0 %{и%}:и
;

Rules


"{а} realisation"
%{а%}:е <=> и | I | у _ ;

"{и} realisation"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ а;

"{у} realisation"
%{у%}:0 <=> _ а;
